Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 2. Equine Infectious Anemia Test Fee.

§ 3.2-1707.
Fees to be assessed; State Veterinarian to collect.

A fee of $1.50 shall be assessed on each equine infectious anemia test performed on samples collected in the Commonwealth. Such fees shall be collected by the State Veterinarian for deposit into the Virginia Horse Industry Promotion and Development Fund established by §

3.2-1704

.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.62; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1708.
Referenda.

The Board, upon petition by members of the horse industry representing at least 10 percent of the number of members of the horse industry who voted in the preceding referendum, or as determined by the Commissioner, may provide for a referendum on the continuation of the equine infectious anemia test assessment in accordance with the provisions of §§

3.2-112

and

3.2-1705

. The Board shall not act on such a petition for conducting such a referendum until at least five years have passed since the last referendum. If the Governor determines that a simple majority is not in favor of the assessment, the Board shall hold no new referendum for at least one year after the Governor has declared his findings. The cost of conducting any such referendum under this section shall be from the Virginia Horse Industry Promotion and Development Fund.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.63; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1709.
Question to be printed on ballots.

The question to be printed on the ballots used in any referendum held under this article shall be as follows:

“Do you favor additional market development, education, publicity, research, and promotion of the Virginia horse industry and continuation of the levy of an assessment of $1.50 on each equine infectious anemia test performed on samples collected in Virginia in accordance with the provisions of the Horse Industry Board law?

_______________
Yes

_______________
No.”

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.64; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1710.
Persons eligible to vote.

Each member of the horse industry who has paid for the administering of the equine infectious anemia test during the previous fiscal year shall be eligible to vote in a referenda, provided that he certifies on forms approved by the Board that he has paid for such a test. Any person meeting such requirements shall be eligible to vote in the referendum, but no person shall be required to be a qualified voter in other respects. Any person who is not an individual shall vote by its authorized representative.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.65; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-1711.
Referenda results; action of Governor.

If the Governor finds any referenda in order, and that at least a simple majority of those voting are in opposition to the continuation of the equine infectious anemia test assessment, he shall so proclaim and upon such proclamation the assessment shall be discontinued. If the Governor finds that at least a simple majority of those voting are in favor of the continuation of the assessment, the Governor shall not so proclaim.

History.

2005, cc. 497, 588, § 3.1-22.66; 2008, c. 860.